DI-236 DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVEHEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION &
SKYHOOK TEMS

DI3GK-04

DTC | c1721/21,c1723/23 | Damping Force Control Actuator
Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

ECU sends a signal to damping force control actuator to drive the rotary valve of the shock absorber chang-
ing the shock absorber damping force.

The actuator is driven electromagnetically by step motor so that it can accurately follow the driving conditions
that change frequently.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
* Frontdamping force control actuator
C1721/21 | \when detecting the over currentdetection condition (When « Frontdamping force control actuator circuit
the conditionthaithecurent betweerthe actuatendriveu * Suspension control ECU
terminalof ECUand GND is 3.5t0 6.0 A or more continued « Reardamping force control actuator
C1723/23 for 1+ 0.5msec.) 10timescontinuously. « Rear damping force control actuator circuit

 Suspension control ECU

HINT:
« CodeC 1721/ 21 correspondstothe front damping force control actuator circuit.
. Code C 1723/23 correspondsto the rear damping force control actuator circuit.
Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the front or rear wheel damping force control actuator circuit, ECU prohibits the damping
force control after the ECU has returned the damping force of the other side wheel to the normal condition.
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DI-238 DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVE HEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION &

SKYHOOK TEMS

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check operation of damping force control actuator.

CHECK:

Using the same method as used for the "ZDAMPING FORCE CONTROLLING CHECK” (See page DI-208),
bounce the vehicle and check that the shock absorber becoming harder.

B

0K> Clear the DTC (See page DI-208).

2 | Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between damping
force control actuator and suspension control ECU (See page IN-35).

@

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

3 | Check damping force control actuator.

F05725

@

PREPARATION:

Disconnect the damping force control actuator connector.
CHECK:

Measure resistance between each terminal of damping force
control actuator.

OK:
Terminals 1 and 2 12.0-13.6 Q
Terminals 2 and 3 12.0-13.6 Q
Terminals 2 and 4 12.0-13.6 Q
Terminals 2 and 5 12.0-13.6 Q

NG> Replace damping force control actuator.

Clear the DTC (See page DI-208).
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